New York, session 2025-2026, A1554.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 13 of section 15-0103 of the environmental 2 conservation law is amended to read as follows: 3 13. All the waters of this state are deemed to be public trust 4 resources. The waters of the state are valuable public natural resources 5 and this state has a duty as trustee to conserve and manage its waters 6 effectively for the use and enjoyment of present and future inhabitants 7 and for the protection of the environment. It is in the best interest of 8 the state that provision be made for the regulation and supervision of 9 activities that deplete, defile, damage or otherwise adversely affect 10 the waters of the state and land resources associated therewith. 11 § 2. The opening paragraph of section 15-0105 of the environmental 12 conservation law is amended to read as follows: 13 In recognition that the waters of the state are public trust 14 resources, and in recognition of its sovereign duty to conserve and 15 control its water resources for the benefit of all inhabitants of the 16 state, it is hereby declared to be the public policy of the state of New 17 York that: 18 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03189-01-5